Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.135.040

Four-year student child care in higher education account.

The four-year student child care in higher education account is established in the custody of the state treasurer. Moneys in the account may be spent only for the purposes of RCW 28B.135.010. Disbursements from the account shall be on the authorization of the office of student financial assistance. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for disbursements.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 241; 2010 1st sp.s. c 9 s 4; 1999 c 375 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 9: See note following RCW 28A.650.035.